apertium-en-lv.lv.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AĀBCČDEĒFGĢHIĪJKĶLĻMNŅOPRSŠTUŪVZŽaābcčdeēfgģhiījkķlļmnņoprsštuūvzž</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="nom"      c="Nominatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="gen"      c="Ģenitīvs"/>
    <sdef n="abl"/>
    <sdef n="dat"      c="Datīvs"/>
    <sdef n="acc"      c="Akuzatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="ins"/>
    <sdef n="loc"      c="Lokatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="voc"      c="Vokatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="sg"       c="Vienskaitlis"/>
    <sdef n="pl"       c="Daudzskaitlis"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="pres"     c="Tagadne"/>
    <sdef n="past"     c="Pagātne"/>
    <sdef n="fut"      c="Nākotne"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="indecl"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="psv"/>
    <sdef n="act"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="subst"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="ind" c="Indirect"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>
  
    <pardef n="un__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lai__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ļoti__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kamēr__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ap__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vis__pref">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vis</l>
          <r>vis<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ne__pref">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>ne<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ārā__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kur__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ļoti__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="klus/i__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āk</l>
          <r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tāl/u__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āk</l>
          <r>u<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="lai"><i>lai</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="iekams"><i>iekams</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ja"><i>ja</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="jo"><i>jo</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ka"><i>ka</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="kamēr"><i>kamēr</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tā kā"><i>tā<b/>kā</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tiklīdz"><i>tiklīdz</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="kolīdz"><i>kolīdz</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="kaut arī"><i>kaut<b/>arī</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="kopš"><i>kopš</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tādēļ ka"><i>tādēļ<b/>ka</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tāpēc ka"><i>tāpēc<b/>ka</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="pirms"><i>pirms</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="lai gan"><i>lai<b/>gan</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="līdzko"><i>līdzko</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="un"><i>un</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jeb"><i>jeb</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="arī"><i>arī</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nedz"><i>nedz</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bet"><i>bet</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="gan"><i>gan</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="aiz"><i>aiz</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ap"><i>ap</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="apakš"><i>apakš</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ar"><i>ar</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ārpus"><i>ārpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bez"><i>bez</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="caur"><i>caur</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="cauri"><i>cauri</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dēļ"><i>dēļ</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="gar"><i>gar</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="garām"><i>garām</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iekš"><i>iekš</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iekšpus"><i>iekšpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iepretim"><i>iepretim</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iz"><i>iz</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kopš"><i>kopš</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="labad"><i>labad</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="līdz"><i>līdz</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="līdzi"><i>līdzi</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="lejpus"><i>lejpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="otrpus"><i>otrpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pa"><i>pa</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="par"><i>par</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pār"><i>pār</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pāri"><i>pāri</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pēc"><i>pēc</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pie"><i>pie</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pirms"><i>pirms</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pret"><i>pret</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pretī"><i>pretī</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="priekš"><i>priekš</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="starp"><i>starp</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="šaipus"><i>šaipus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viņpus"><i>viņpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="virs"><i>virs</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="virspus"><i>virspus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="zem"><i>zem</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="laikā"><i>laikā</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ļoti"><i>ļoti</i><par n="ļoti__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ļoti"><i>ļoti</i><par n="ļoti__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="kur"><i>kur</i><par n="kur__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vai"><i>vai</i><par n="kur__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ne"><i>ne</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ārā"><i>ārā</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="šeit"><i>šeit</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="apakšā"><i>apakšā</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jau"><i>jau</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="no dabas"><i>no<b/>dabas</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="no a līdz z"><i>no<b/>a<b/>līdz<b/>z</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lai kur"><i>lai<b/>kur</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="klusi"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>klus</i><par n="klus/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tālu"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>tāl</i><par n="tāl/u__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cauri"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>caur</i><par n="klus/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="akls"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>akl</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anāls"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>anāl</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="atriebīgs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>atriebīg</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bagātīgs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>bagātīg</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="birokrātisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>birokrātisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="caurs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>caur</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="despotisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>despotisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dusmīgs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>dusmīg</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eklektisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>eklektisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="empīrisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>empīrisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fotogēnisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>fotogēnisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gluds"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>glud</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="histērisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>histērisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dogmatisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>dogmatisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ierēdniecisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>ierēdniecisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="infrasarkans"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>infrasarkan</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jēls"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>jēl</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="intīms"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>intīm</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="karalisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>karalisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="komisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>komisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="korpulents"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>korpulent</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kuriozs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>kurioz</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="laicīgs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>laicīg</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nedabīgs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>nedabīg</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nefamiliārs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>nefamiliār</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nekautrīgs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>nekautrīg</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="koleģiāls"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>koleģiāl</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="liels"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>liel</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="loģisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>loģisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mantīgs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>mantīg</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mikls"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>mikl</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mērens"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>mēren</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="noteikts"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>noteikt</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pakāpenisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>pakāpenisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="platonisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>platonisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="publisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>publisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="reālistisks"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>reālistisk</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sievišķs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>sievišķ</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="spokains"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>spokain</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="temperamentīgs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>temperamentīg</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="utains"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>utain</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vējgrābslīgs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>vējgrābslīg</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ūdensizturīgs"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>ūdensizturīg</i><par n="agr/s__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="atrast"><par n="ne__pref"/><i>atr</i><par n="atr/ast__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mīlēt"><par n="ne__pref"/><i>mīl</i><par n="mīl/ēt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tikt"><par n="ne__pref"/><i>t</i><par n="t/ikt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="varēt"><par n="ne__pref"/><i>var</i><par n="var/ēt__vbmod"/></e>
